Utah statutes.
34-44-202.   Payment of commission -- Payment on termination -- Settlement.
(1)  The principal shall pay a sales representative all commissions due to the
sales representative during the time the business relationship between the
principal and sales representative is in effect in accordance with the writing
required by Section 34-44-201.
(2)  If a business relationship between a principal and sales representative
terminates, the principal shall pay to the sales representative:
(a)  within 30 days after the day on which the termination is effective, all
commissions due on the day on which the termination is effective; and
(b)  within 14 days after the day on which a commission becomes due if the
commission is due after the day on which the termination is effective.
(3) (a)  Unless payment is made pursuant to a binding and final written
settlement agreement and release, the acceptance by a sales representative of
a partial commission paid by the principal under the business relationship
does not constitute a release as to the balance of any commission that the
sales representative claims is due because of the business relationship.
(b)  A full release of all commission claims required by a principal as a
condition to a partial commission payment is void.
